California statutes. Harbors and Navigation Code
Ordinances may be enacted by and for any district by initiative in the same manner and with the same effect as ordinances of counties under Article 1 (commencing at Section 9100) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code and the terms used therein shall have the following meanings:

(a) “County” shall mean district.

(b) “Board of supervisors” shall mean board.

(c) “Elections official” shall mean secretary.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 116.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

7121.

(a) No ordinance shall become effective until 30 days from and after the date of its passage, except the following:

(1) An ordinance calling or otherwise relating to an election.

(2) An ordinance for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, that contains a declaration of, and the facts constituting, its urgency, and is passed by a four-fifths vote of the board. 

(b) Prior to the effective date thereof ordinances shall be subject to referendum in the same manner and with the same effect as ordinances of counties under Article 2 (commencing with Section 9140) of Chapter 2 of Division 9 of the Elections Code and terms used therein shall have the meanings set forth in Section 7120.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 117.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Powers [7140. - 7158.]

7140.

The district may exercise the powers expressly granted in this part or in any other law or necessarily implied therefrom. The district has the power generally to perform all acts necessary to carry out fully the provisions, powers and purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7141.

The district has perpetual succession.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7142.

The district may sue and be sued in all actions and proceedings, in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7143.

The district may levy and cause to be collected taxes for the purpose of paying the principal of and interest on any indebtedness, whether evidenced by bonds, notes, or other similar evidences of indebtedness, or to pay amounts required by contracts or leases, or to pay any other expenses or claims incurred in carrying out fully the provisions, powers and purposes of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7144.

The district may make contracts for any and all purposes necessary or convenient for the full exercise of its powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7145.

The district may employ labor, professional services, agents, servants and employees necessary to manage, maintain, and control the harbor and to enable the district to exercise its powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7146.

The district may take by grant, purchase, gift, devise or lease or other acquisition, hold, use, enjoy, lease or dispose of real and personal property of every kind, within or without the district necessary to the full or convenient exercise of its powers.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7147.

The district may acquire by eminent domain any property necessary, convenient or useful to the exercise of its powers, but may exercise the power to acquire property outside the district by eminent domain only with the consent of the governing body of the county, or city if any, in which the property is located.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 582.)
-------------------------------------------

7148.

Any county, city and county, city, or other political subdivision or agency of the State, in this section referred to as “public agency,” which has been invested by grant from the State with the ownership, possession, control or management of tide and submerged lands or any other lands lying under, washed by or abutting the Pacific Ocean, or inland waters of the State, including the beds of navigable rivers, streams, lakes, bays, estuaries, inlets and straits, may, with the prior written consent of the State Lands Commission, agree in writing that any district formed pursuant to this part shall for the term stated in the writing have all or any right, title and interests of any such public agency and exercise all or any jurisdiction of any such public agency in the lands over the lands or any portion thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7149.

The district may acquire, construct, reconstruct, improve, repair, develop, maintain, and operate a harbor and all facilities appurtenant thereto, connected therewith, or incidental thereto, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(a) The dredging of channels, shipways, berths, anchorage places, and turning basins.

(b) The acquisition, reconstruction, repair, and maintenance of jetties, breakwaters, bulkheads, seawalls, wharves, docks, ways, ferry slips, warehouses, streets, roads, drives, parkways, avenues, approaches, marinas, aquatic playgrounds, beach parks, bathing beaches, and other recreation facilities, together with structures and facilities incidental thereto.

(c) The acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, maintenance, operation, development, and regulation of fueling, loading and unloading, towing, repair, warehousing, shipping and reshipping, and other facilities, aids, equipment, or property necessary for, or incidental to, the development and operation of the harbor.

(d) The acquisition, construction, reconstruction, repair, maintenance, and operation of fireboats, sanitary, and other facilities necessary for the proper protection of the harbor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 29.)
-------------------------------------------

7150.

The district may lease any property, whether real or personal, and any interest therein to, of and from any person, firm or public or private corporation, or public agency with the privilege of purchasing or otherwise.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7151.

The district may join with the United States or any department or agency thereof, the State or any department or agency thereof, any county, city and county, city, district or other public or private corporation, or one or more or any other combination of the foregoing, for the purpose of carrying out any of the powers of the district, including, without limitation, provisions for the financing of acquisitions, constructions, developments and operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7152.

The board may, by ordinance, establish general rules for the government of the harbor, including, without limiting the generality of the foregoing:

(a) The regulation of anchoring, mooring, towing, wharfage and dockage of vessels and the establishment and collection of rates, fees and charges therefor.

(b) The establishment and collection of rates, fees and charges for service from or use of any of the facilities owned, controlled, furnished or operated by the district.

(c) The supervision of pilots and the pilotage of all vessels within the harbor and the establishment and collection of fees and charges therefor.

(d) The regulation of the construction of wharves, docks, buildings and improvements of all types on property owned or controlled by the district.

(e) The issuance of licenses and permits for privileges to be exercised in and about the harbor upon equal terms and the establishment and collection of rates, fees and charges therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7153.

The district may construct any works along, under, or across any street, road, or watercourse upon payment of compensation therefor, if required, in a manner that will afford security for life and property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 30.)
-------------------------------------------

7154.

The district may use any lands acquired or owned by the district for street or highway purposes. If it is necessary or expedient to convey any of the lands owned by the district for street or highway purposes, the board, by resolution, may authorize the president and secretary to execute the deed to the public entity entitled thereto and deliver it to the proper authority representing the grantee.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

7155.

The district may sell and issue franchises relating to the harbor and its works, appurtenances, properties, and rights in accordance with procedure as may be prescribed by ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 32.)
-------------------------------------------

7156.

The district may advertise its advantages and solicit business within or without the district, within other states or any foreign countries through such employees or agents as are expedient.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 195, Sec. 33.)
-------------------------------------------

7158.

The district may accept aid from the United States or any department or agency thereof or from the State or any department or agency thereof and from any county, city and county, city, district or other public or private corporation or person. Any county, or city and county, or city, any portion of which is within the district may provide such money as in the opinion of its legislative body may be required, necessary or expedient to be provided in aid of any of the uses or purposes set forth in Section 7149.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Financial Provisions [7170. - 7243.]



  ARTICLE 1. General [7170. - 7176.]

7170.

A district may borrow money, incur indebtedness, and issue bonds or other evidences of indebtedness as provided in this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7171.

A district may issue warrants payable in not to exceed two years from their date, to pay the formation expenses of the district, which warrants may bear interest at a rate of not exceeding 6 percent per annum from date of issue until paid, which formation expenses may include fees of attorneys and others employed to conduct formation proceedings.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7172.

All claims for money or damages against the district are governed by Part 3 (commencing with Section 900) and Part 4 (commencing with Section 940) of Division 3.6 of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto. Except for bonds and interest coupons which shall be paid when due, all claims shall be approved in writing by the president or a member of the board designated for such purpose, or approved by the board in open meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 1715.)
-------------------------------------------

7173.

Warrants shall be drawn by the treasurer and signed by the president, or a member of the board designated for the purpose and by the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7174.

The treasurer shall install and maintain a system of auditing and accounting that shall completely and at all times show the financial condition of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7175.

The treasurer shall make annual, or oftener if the board so orders, written reports to the board as to the receipts and disbursements and balances in the several accounts under his control. The report shall be signed by him and filed with the secretary. At least yearly the books and accounts of the district shall be audited by an independent certified public accountant or public accountant or firm of certified public accountants or public accountants employed by the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7176.

A bank may act as depositary, paying agent or fiscal agent for the holding or handling of district funds, notwithstanding the fact that a member of the board is an officer, employee or stockholder of the bank, or of a holding company that owns any of the stock of the bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Alternative—County Treasurer as Depositary [7190. - 7195.]

7190.

As an alternative to the procedures of Article 1 (commencing at Section 7170) the board may by resolution designate the county treasurer of the county in which the district is situated to be the depositary and have the custody of all the district’s money. The resolution shall be filed with the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7191.

The county treasurer shall:

(a) Receive and receipt for all the district’s money and place it in the county treasury to the credit of the district.

(b) Be responsible upon his official bond for the safekeeping and disbursing of all district money so held by him.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7192.

The county treasurer shall pay, when due, out of district money, all sums payable on outstanding bonds and coupons of the district; and the county treasurer shall pay any other sums out of district money, or any portion thereof, only upon warrants of the county auditor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7193.

The county auditor shall draw warrants to pay claims made against the district when the claims have been approved in writing by the president or a member of the board designated for the purpose or approved by the board in open meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7194.

The county treasurer shall report in writing on the first day of July, October, January and March of each year to the board with respect to each of the following:

(a) The amount of money he then holds for the district.

(b) The amount of receipts since his last report.

(c) The amount paid out since his last report. The report shall be verified and filed with the secretary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7195.

The board of supervisors of the county shall determine the charge to be made against the district for any services of either or both of:

(a) The county treasurer as custodian of the district’s money.

(b) The county auditor in drawing warrants to pay demands, made and approved, against the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Short Term Borrowing [7200. - 7202.]

7200.

A district may incur indebtedness for any purpose for which the district is authorized to expend funds by the issuance of negotiable promissory notes pursuant to this article without an election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7201.

Said notes shall be payable in not to exceed five years from their date and shall bear interest at not exceeding 6 percent per annum, payable as provided therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7202.

The total aggregate amount of said notes outstanding at any one time shall not exceed a limit of 2 percent of the assessed valuation of the taxable property in the district or, if the assessed valution is not obtainable, 2 percent of the county auditor’s estimate of the taxable property in the district evidenced by his certificate, provided:

(a) A district which has been formed for less than 18 months may exceed said limit and in the event may borrow an aggregate amount of not to exceed thirty-five thousand dollars ($35,000).

(b) No district shall borrow more than an aggregate amount of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000).

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. General Obligation Bonds [7210. - 7227.]

7210.

Whenever the board deems if necessary for the district to incur a general obligation bonded indebtedness for (a) the acquisition, construction, completion or repair of any or all improvements, works or property mentioned in this part, or (b) the funding or refunding of any outstanding indebtedness of the district, including premiums, if any be payable, the board shall, by resolution, so declare and call an election to be held in the district for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7211.

The resolution shall state:

(a) The purpose for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance and sale of the bonds.

(b) The amount of debt to be incurred.

(c) The maximum term the bonds proposed to be issued shall run before maturity, which shall not exceed 40 years.

(d) The maximum rate of interest to be paid, which shall not exceed 6 percent per annum, payable semiannualy, except that interest for the first year may be payable at the end of the year.

(e) The measure to be submitted to the voters.

(f) The date upon which an election shall be held for the purpose of authorizing the bonded indebtedness to be incurred; and

(g) The designation of the precincts, the location of the polling places and the names of the officers selected to conduct the election, who shall consist of one inspector, one judge, and two clerks in each precinct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7212.

Notice of the holding of the election shall be given by publishing the resolution calling the election pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code in at least one newspaper published in the district. The first publication to be at least two weeks prior to the date of the election. If there is no newspaper published in the district the resolutions shall be posted in three public places in the district for not less than two weeks prior to the date of the election. No other notice of the election need be given.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7213.

The returns of the election shall be made, the votes canvassed at least seven days following the election, and the results thereof ascertained and declared in accordance with the provisions of the Elections Code, so far as they may be applicable, except as otherwise provided in this part. The secretary, as soon as the result is declared, shall enter in the district records a statement of the result of the election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7214.

No irregularities or informalities in conducting the election shall invalidate the same, if the election shall have been otherwise fairly conducted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7215.

Any action or proceeding wherein the validity of the election or of the proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned or denied, shall be commenced within three months from the date of the election; otherwise the election and all proceedings in relation thereto shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7216.

If from the election returns it appears that more than two-thirds of the votes cast upon the measure were in favor of and assented to the incurring of the general obligation bonded indebtedness, then the board may, by resolution, at the time or times it deems proper, issue bonds of the district for the whole or any part of the amount of the indebtedness so authorized, and may from time to time provide for the issuance of such amounts as the necessity thereof may appear, until the full amount of the bonds authorized shall have been issued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7217.

The full amount of bonds may be divided into two or more series and different dates fixed for the bonds of each series. The maximum term which the bonds of any series shall run before maturity shall not exceed 40 years from the date of each series respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7218.

The board shall, by resolution, prescribe the form of the bonds and the form of the coupons attached thereto and fix the time when the whole or any part of the principal shall become due and payable. The payment of the first installment of principal may be deferred for a period of not more than five years from the date of the bonds or the date of the bonds of each series respectively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7219.

The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates not to exceed 6 percent per annum payable semiannually, except that interest for the first year shall be payable at the end of the year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7220.

The board may also provide for the call and redemption of bonds prior to maturity at the time and prices and upon such other terms as it may specify. A bond shall not be subject to call or redemption prior to maturity unless it contains a recital to that effect, or unless a statement to that effect is printed thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7221.

The denomination of the bonds shall be stated in the resolution providing for their issuance, but shall not be less than one hundred dollars ($100).

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7222.

The principal and interest shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the treasurer of the district or at any other place or places as may be designated, or at either place or places at the option of the holder of the bond.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7223.

The bonds shall be dated, numbered consecutively, and be signed by the president of the board and the treasurer of the district and countersigned by the secretary of the district and the official seal of the district affixed. The interest coupons of the bonds shall be signed by the treasurer of the district. All the signatures and countersignatures may be printed, lithographed or mechanically reproduced, except that one of said signatures or countersignatures to said bonds shall be manually affixed.

If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on any bonds or coupons ceases to be an officer before the delivery of the bonds to the purchaser, the signature or countersignature either on the bonds or the coupons, or on both, is nevertheless valid and sufficient for all purposes the same as if the officer had remained in office until the delivery of the bonds, and the signature upon the coupons of the person who is treasurer at the date of the bonds, is valid although the bonds themselves may be attested by a different person who is treasurer at the time of delivery of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7224.

Before selling the bonds, or any part thereof, the board shall give notice inviting sealed bids in such manner as it may prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, it may reject all bids received, if any, and either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7225.

The proceeds from the sale of the bonds shall be paid into the treasury of the district and placed to the credit of a special improvement fund and expended only for the purpose for which the indebtedness was created; however, when the purpose has been accomplished, any moneys remaining in the special improvement fund may be transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7226.

Any action or proceeding, wherein the validity of any such bonds or of proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned or denied, shall be commenced within three months from the date of the issuance thereof; otherwise said bonds and all proceedings in relation thereto shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7227.

Any general obligation bonds issued by a district shall have the same force, value and use as bonds issued by any city and shall be exempt from all taxation within the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Revenue Bonds [7240. - 7243.]

7240.

The district may issue revenue bonds for any purpose mentioned in this part under the provisions of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing at Section 54300) of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7241.

If revenue bonds are issued, the bonds shall be authorized by a majority of the qualified electors as provided in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 (Chapter 6 (commencing at Section 54300) of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7243.

In any ordinance or resolution calling an election to authorize the issuance of revenue bonds of the district, the board may insert a provision that it intends to provide, as further security for the bonds, for a limited tax levy (stating the limit as to rate) which shall be levied from time to time to the extent to which revenues pledged to the payment of the principal of and interest on the bonds have been or are expected to be insufficient in any year to pay said principal and interest or to the extent to which any reserve fund established for said bonds has been or will be used to pay, or to provide for the payment of, such principal or interest. If such provision is so inserted and if the bonds are authorized by a fifty-one percent (51%) favorable vote, the board may insert in the ordinance or resolution providing for the issuance of such bonds a provision for such limited tax levy and such terms, conditions and covenants as may be necessary or convenient for the carrying out of such provision. The limited tax levies authorized by this section shall not in the aggregate exceed in any one year seventy-five cents ($0.75) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Taxation [7260. - 7266.]

7260.

After the incurring of any general obligation indebtedness, evidenced by general obligation bonds, and annually thereafter until the indebtedness is paid or until there is a sum in the treasury of the district set apart for that purpose sufficient to meet all payments of principal of and interest on the indebtedness as it becomes due, the board shall cause a tax to be levied, as herein provided sufficient to pay the interest and principal as will become due before the proceeds of a tax levied at the next general tax levy will be available.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7261.

To the extent to which moneys are in the treasury from a source other than the annual tax levy required by Section 7260 and are set apart for the payment of principal of and interest on indebtedness as provided in Section 7260, the tax therein required may be reduced.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7262.

On or before the first day of August the board of directors of the district shall furnish to the board of supervisors and to the auditor, respectively, in writing:

(a) An estimate of the minimum amount of money required by Section 7243 to be raised by taxation during the fiscal year.

(b) An estimate of the minimum amount of money required to be raised by taxation to comply with, but subject to the limitations of, any provision inserted pursuant to Section 7243 in any ordinance or resolution providing for the issuance of revenue bonds.

(c) An estimate of the minimum amount of money required to be raised by taxation during the fiscal year for all other purposes of the district. Taxes levied for purposes of the district other than pursuant to Section 7243 or Section 7260 shall not in the aggregate exceed in any one year seventy-five cents ($0.75) on each one hundred dollars ($100) of assessed valuation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 208.)
-------------------------------------------

7263.

After the board has furnished the estimate, the board of supervisors, annually, at the time and in the manner of levying other county taxes, shall levy upon the property within the district and cause to be collected a tax sufficient to pay the amounts set forth in Section 7262.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7264.

All district taxes shall be collected at the same time and in the same manner and form as county taxes and shall be paid to the district for which they were levied and collected.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7265.

All district taxes whether for the payment of indebtedness and the interest thereon or for other purposes are of the same force and effect as other liens for taxes, and their collection shall be enforced by the same means as provided for the enforcement of liens for state and county taxes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

7266.

(a) The district may, in any year, levy assessments, reassessments, or special taxes and issue bonds to finance waterway construction projects and related operations and maintenance, or operations and maintenance projects independent of construction projects in accordance with, and pursuant to, the Improvement Act of 1911 (Division 7 (commencing with Section 5000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Improvement Bond Act of 1915 (Division 10 (commencing with Section 8500) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Municipal Improvement Act of 1913 (Division 12 (commencing with Section 10000) of the Streets and Highways Code), the Benefit Assessment Act of 1982 (Chapter 6.4 (commencing with Section 54703) of the Government Code), the Integrated Financing District Act (Chapter 1.5 (commencing with Section 53175) of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), the Mello-Roos Community Facilities Act of 1982 (Chapter 2.5 (commencing with Section 53311) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code), and the Marks-Roos Local Bond Pooling Act of 1985 (Article 4 (commencing with Section 6584) of Chapter 5 of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(b) Sections 5116, 5117, 5118, 5119, 5190, 5191, 5192, 5193, 10104, and 10302 of the Streets and Highways Code shall not apply to assessment proceedings undertaken pursuant to this section. 

(c) Notwithstanding the related provisions of any assessment act which the district is authorized to use, any assessment diagram which any of those acts requires to be prepared prior to final approval of the assessment district may show only the exterior boundaries of the assessment district and the boundaries of any assessment zones or improvement areas within the district. The diagram may refer to the county assessor’s maps and records for a detailed description of each lot or parcel. 

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the district may levy and collect assessments and reassessments in the same manner as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 51320) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 of Division 15 of the Water Code, to pay any or all of the following: 

(1) For the operation and maintenance of projects, including maintenance of lands, easements, rights-of-way, dredge material disposal areas, and remediation. 

(2) For the satisfaction of liabilities arising from projects.

(3) To accumulate a fund which may be used to advance the cost of district projects, provided that the advances be repaid, with interest as determined by the commissioners, from assessments, reassessments, special taxes, or fees charged by the district pursuant to this section. 

(4) To acquire real property, easements, or rights-of-way for a navigation project or the maintenance of a navigation project. 

(5) To acquire real property within the district for disposal of dredged material. 

(e) For purposes of this section, functions designated by Article 3 (commencing with Section 51320) of Chapter 2 of Part 7 of Division 15 of the Water Code to be performed by the board of supervisors, the board of trustees, or valuation commissioners shall be performed by the district’s board. 

(f) For purposes of this section, the board may order the creation of a separate assessment roll to pay the allowable expenses of any single project or any group or system of projects. 

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all assessments, reassessments, and taxes levied by the district may be collected together with, and not separately from, taxes for county purposes. Any county in which the district is located may collect, at the request of the district, all assessments, reassessments, and special taxes levied by the district and shall cause those revenues to be deposited into the county treasury to the credit of the district. Each county may deduct its reasonable collection and administrative costs. 

(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any assessment or reassessment levied pursuant to this section may be apportioned on the basis of land use category, tonnage shipped on the waterway, size and type of vessel using the waterway, front footage, acreage, capital improvements, or other reasonable basis, separately or in combination, as determined by the district commissioners. 

(i) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, Division 4 (commencing with Section 2800) of the Streets and Highways Code shall not apply to any assessment levied by the district. 

(j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no bond issued pursuant to this section shall be used to fund the routine maintenance dredging of channels.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 978, Sec. 8.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Changes in Organization [7280. - 7280.]



  ARTICLE 1. Annexation [7280. - 7280.]

7280.

Land in the same county in which the district is located, whether contiguous or not or incorporated or not, which is not a part of the district may be annexed thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Construction [7340. - 7340.]

7340.

If any section, subsection, sentence, clause, or phrase of this part, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, is for any reason held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this part, or the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances, shall not be affected thereby. The Legislature hereby declares that it would have passed this part, and each section, subsection, sentence, clause, and phrase thereof, irrespective of the fact that one or more sections, subsections, sentences, clauses or phrases, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance, be held invalid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1598.)
-------------------------------------------

